Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.490

Nurse anesthetists grant program.

Subject to amounts appropriated specifically for this purpose, the Washington state board of nursing shall develop and manage a grant process for the purposes of providing incentives to certified registered nurse anesthetists to precept nurse anesthesia residents in health care settings. The board of nursing shall ensure the funds in the grant process are distributed equally among the total qualified applicant preceptors that dedicate at least 80 hours per year to precepting any nurse anesthesia residents. The goal of the grant program is to create more clinical placements for nurse anesthesia residents to complete required clinical hours to earn their degree and related licensure.

[ 2024 c 363 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—2024 c 363: "The health care system faces increasing costs and workforce shortages. Health care facilities are facing a shortage of anesthesia providers. The legislature recognizes certified registered nurse anesthetists as essential providers of safe, cost-effective, and accessible anesthesia care for Washington residents. It is the intent of the legislature to encourage an ongoing supply and improve the pipeline of certified registered nurse anesthetists in Washington state through educational promotion and expansion." [ 2024 c 363 s 1.]